Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 8 Consumers’ Cooperatives

7-8-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Consumer Cooperative Association Law”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-1

.

7-8-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Association” means any corporation formed under this chapter.

“Capital”, in the case of an association formed without capital stock, means the aggregate amount of consideration for which the total number of memberships in the association were issued.

“Cooperative basis”, as applied to any incorporated or unincorporated group referred to in these provisions, means that:

Each member has only one vote, except as is altered in the articles of association or bylaws by provision for voting by member organizations. However, voting by member organizations shall not be on the basis of the number of shares held by the organizations.

The maximum rate of return on share or membership capital is not more than eight percent (8%) per year.

The net savings, or net income, after making provision for payment of return on capital, and for any separate funds and purposes that are not inconsistent with its cooperative character, are allocated or distributed to member patrons, or to all patrons, in proportion to their patronage.

“Member” means not only a member in a nonshare association but also a member in a share association.

“Membership” means, in the case of a share association, the status whereby a shareholder becomes entitled to all the rights, including, but not limited to, the right of voting and of receiving dividends on shares, and apportionment of net savings in cash, which accrue to him or her under the articles of association and bylaws upon the acquisition of the minimum number of shares of stock required by the articles of association for membership and upon fulfillment of the eligibility requirements of the association.

“Par value”, in the case of membership in an association formed without shares, means the consideration, in terms of money, for which the membership was issued.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-2

.

7-8-3.
Authorized purposes.

An association may be incorporated, with or without capital stock, under this chapter for the purpose of carrying on any lawful business permitted by §

7-1.2-301

for the mutual benefit of its patrons, or their patrons, or any patrons’ patrons, as ultimate consumers, or for the purpose of doing business for the benefit of its member patrons in all things relating directly or indirectly to the catching, processing, storing, transporting, marketing, and distributing of fish and other aquatic products of all kinds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-3

; P.L. 1985, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 6; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 6.

7-8-4.
Application of general corporation law.

The provisions of chapter 1.2 of this title apply to associations formed under this chapter, except insofar as they are inconsistent with this chapter.

Wherever, in chapter 1.2 the word “stockholder” or “stockholders” is used, the word shall be construed, where appropriate, to include within its meaning members in associations formed without capital stock. Nothing contained in these chapters, however, shall be construed to permit associations formed under the provisions of this chapter to issue stock without par value.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-4

; P.L. 1985, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 6; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 6.

7-8-5.
Federation and cooperation between associations.

In addition to the powers granted to it by §

7-1.2-302

, an association has power to:

Own and hold membership in other associations formed under any laws of this state, or of any other state, country, nation, or government, and while the holder thereof, to exercise all the rights of membership;

Make agreements of mutual aid or federation with other associations, other groups organized on a cooperative basis, and other nonprofit groups.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-5

; P.L. 1985, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 6; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 6; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 9.

7-8-6.
Contents of articles of association.

The articles of association shall contain, in addition to the information required by §§

7-1.2-202(a)(1)

,

7-1.2-202(a)(3)

and

7-1.2-202(a)(4)

, the following:

A statement that the corporation is formed as a cooperative association under the provisions of this chapter;

A statement whether the association is organized with or without shares;

If organized with shares, the information required by §

7-1.2-202(a)(2)

;

The minimum number or value of shares that must be owned in order to qualify for membership; if organized without shares, a statement whether the property rights of members are equal or unequal, and if unequal, the rule by which their rights are determined;

The maximum amount or percentage of capital that may be owned or controlled by any member;

The method by which any surplus, upon dissolution of the association, is distributed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-6

; P.L. 1985, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 6; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 6.

7-8-7.
Name of association.

The name of the association shall include the word “cooperative”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-7

.

7-8-8.
Fee payable to secretary of state by nonstock corporation.

In the case of an association formed without shares, by virtue of this chapter, the fees payable to the secretary of state for the incorporation is fifty dollars ($50.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 32; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-8

; P.L. 1960, ch. 71, art. 3, § 29; P.L. 1971, ch. 163, § 1.

7-8-9.
Amendment of articles.

The articles of association may be amended, as provided in chapter 1.2 of this title, by an affirmative vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the members voting at a meeting duly called for the purpose. If the amendment is to alter the preferences of outstanding shares of any type, or to authorize the issuance of shares having preferences superior to outstanding shares of any type, the affirmative vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the members owning the outstanding shares affected by the change is also required for the adoption of the amendment. If the amendment is to alter the rule by which members’ property rights in a nonshare association are determined, a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the entire membership is required.

Notice of any meeting to consider amendments to the articles of association must be sent at least three (3) weeks in advance of the meeting to each member at his or her last known address, accompanied by the full text of the proposal and the part of the articles to be amended.

There shall be paid to the secretary of state, upon the filing and certification of the articles of amendment, a fee of five dollars ($5.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-10

; P.L. 1971, ch. 163, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 6; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 6; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 9.

7-8-10.
Contents of bylaws.

The bylaws may, in addition to the provisions permitted by §

7-1.2-203(a)

, except where inconsistent with this chapter, provide for:

The method and terms of admission to membership and the disposal of members’ interests on cessation of membership for any reason;

The method of distributing the net savings of the association.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-10

; P.L. 1985, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 6; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 6.

7-8-11.
Meetings of members.

Regular meetings of members shall be held at least once a year. Special meetings may be demanded by a written petition of at least one-tenth (1/10) of the membership, in which case it is the duty of the secretary to call the meeting to take place within thirty (30) days after the demand. Meetings of the members may be held within or without this state.

The articles of association or bylaws may provide for meetings by units of the membership and may provide for a method of transmitting the votes there cast to the central meeting, or for a method of representation by the election of delegates to the central meeting, or for a combination of both methods.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-11

.

7-8-12.
Voting rights.

Each member of an association shall have only one vote, except that where an association includes among its members any number of other associations or groups organized on a cooperative basis, the voting rights of the member associations or groups may be as prescribed in the articles of association or bylaws. However, voting by the member organizations shall in no case be on the basis of the number of shares held by the organization.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-12

.

7-8-13.
Proxy and mail votes.

No member is permitted to vote by proxy, except that the articles of association or bylaws may provide for the casting of ballots by mail and may include in the provisions a provision allowing ballots to be sent to members absent from a meeting. However, the voting shall be only upon candidates for office, or upon propositions the text of which shall have been sent to the members entitled so to vote a specified number of days in advance of the date by which the ballots must be returned.

The articles of association or bylaws may also determine whether and to what extent mail votes are counted in computing a quorum.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-13

.

7-8-14.
Mail voting included in statutory provisions.

If an association has provided for voting by mail, or by delegates, any provision of this chapter referring to votes cast by members is construed to include votes cast by mail, or by delegates, but this does not permit delegates to vote by mail.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-14

.

7-8-15.
Apportionment of directors among units.

The bylaws may provide for a method of apportioning the number of directors among the units into which the association may be divided, and for the election of directors by the respective units to which they are apportioned.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-15

.

7-8-16.
Restriction on dividends.

The return upon capital shall not exceed six percent (6%) per year upon the paid up capital and is noncumulative.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-16

.

7-8-17.
Membership of organizations — Payment of capital as prerequisite to membership.

No corporation or organization or group of any kind shall be eligible to membership in an association unless it is organized on a cooperative or nonprofit basis, and no person, association, or organization or group of any kind shall be deemed a member of an association until the association has received payment in full for the par value of the minimum amount of share or membership capital stated in the articles as necessary to qualify for membership.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-17

; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 9.

7-8-18.
Share and membership certificates.

No certificate for share or membership capital shall be issued until its par value has been paid for in full. There shall be printed on each certificate issued by an association a full or condensed statement of the requirements of §

7-8-12

, the first clause of the first sentence of §

7-8-13

, and §§

7-8-20

—

7-8-24

.

Each member, upon fulfilling the requirements of §

7-8-17

, and of the articles of association, and/or bylaws of the association, including approval of his or her membership by the board of directors, if required, is entitled to a certificate for the amount of his paid-up share or membership capital.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-18

.

7-8-19.
Application of corporation and franchise taxes to associations without stock.

For the purposes of taxation, under chapters 11 and 12 [repealed] of title 44, of an association formed under this chapter without capital stock, the words “share” and “stock” and “capital stock” are construed to include within their meaning memberships in the association.

For the purposes of taxation, under chapter 11 of title 44, of an association formed under this chapter without capital stock, the tax, if any, is based on the number of memberships outstanding in the association.

The par value of the memberships shall, for the purposes of computing the amount of tax due under chapters 11 and 12 [repealed] of title 44, be taken as the amount for which the memberships were issued.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 33; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-19

.

7-8-20.
Association’s preemptive right to repurchase shares.

If any holder of shares desires to dispose of any or all of his or her holdings in the association, he or she shall offer the holdings to the association, and the directors have the power to purchase, within ninety (90) days of the offer, the holdings by paying the member the par value of any or all of the holdings offered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-20

.

7-8-21.
Transfer of holdings.

If the association fails, within ninety (90) days, to purchase all or any part of the holdings offered, their holder may dispose of the unpurchased interest elsewhere. No transferee of holdings in an association is entitled to the rights of membership until the transferee fulfills the requirements of eligibility of the association, including approval of his or her membership by the board of directors, if required.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-21

.

7-8-22.
Recall of shares.

The bylaws may give the directors the power to use the reserve funds to recall, at par value, the holdings of any member in excess of the amount requisite for membership. The bylaws may also provide that if any member has failed to patronize the association during a period of time specified in the bylaws, the directors may use reserve funds to recall all of his or her holdings, and he or she at that time ceases to be a member of the association.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-22

.

7-8-23.
Impairment of solvency prohibited.

No purchase or recall shall be made by the directors under §

7-8-20

or any other section if to do so would impair the solvency of the association.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-23

.

7-8-24.
Expulsion of members.

The bylaws may make provision for the expulsion of members by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the members present at a regular or special meeting. The bylaws shall provide for the giving to a member of written notice of the charges against him or her at least three (3) weeks in advance of the meeting. The member shall have opportunity to be heard in person, or by counsel, at the meeting. On decision of the association to expel a member, the board of directors shall purchase the member’s holdings at par value, when there are sufficient reserve funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-24

.

7-8-25.
Exemption of holdings from attachment.

The holdings of any member of an association, to the extent of the minimum amount necessary for membership, but not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00), is exempt from attachment, execution, or garnishment for the debts of the owner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-25

.

7-8-26.
Apportionment of net savings.

At least once a year, the members and/or directors, as provided in the articles of association or bylaws, shall apportion the net savings of the association, after payment of return on capital, and after deduction of sums retained for proper corporate purposes, which may include an educational fund and a fund for the general welfare of the members, among member patrons, or to all patrons of the association in proportion to their patronage. However:

Not less than ten percent (10%) shall be placed in a reserve fund until such time as the fund equals at least fifty percent (50%) of the paid-up capital, and the fund may be used in the general conduct of business.

Sums allocated to subscribers and nonmembers as a result of the apportionment need not be paid in cash but may, if the articles of association or bylaws provide, be credited on the books of the association toward the payment of the minimum amount of share or membership capital subscribed for, or necessary for membership.

If, within any period of time specified in the bylaws:

Any subscriber has not accumulated and paid in the amount of capital subscribed for, or necessary for membership, whichever is specified in the articles of association or bylaws; or

Any nonmember has not accumulated in his or her account the sum necessary for membership, or has accumulated the sum but neither requests nor agrees to become a member, or fails to comply with any provisions of the bylaws for admission to membership, then the amount accumulated or paid in may, if the articles of association or bylaws provide, be added to the general funds of the association, and subsequently no member, subscriber, or nonmember has any further rights in the paid-in capital or accumulated credits.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-26

; P.L. 1985, ch. 2, § 1.

7-8-27.
Contents of annual report.

The annual report of an association shall include a statement of the receipts, expenditures, assets, and liabilities of the association, and shall, in the case of a nonshare association, include, in lieu of the statement concerning its authorized and issued capital stock required by §

7-1.2-1501

, a statement of the total number of members, the number admitted and withdrawn during the year, and the amount of membership fees received.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-27

; P.L. 1985, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 6; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 6.

7-8-28.
Distribution of assets on dissolution.

Upon dissolution of an association, its assets, if any, after payment of the expenses of dissolution and the debts of the association, shall be distributed as follows:

By returning to the members the par value of their shares or of their membership certificates, returning to subscribers the amounts paid on their subscriptions, and returning to those entitled to them the amounts allocated in distribution of net savings as contemplated by §

7-8-26

; and

By distributing any surplus as provided in the articles of association.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-28

.

7-8-29.
Bonding of officers and employees.

Every individual acting as officer or employee of an association, and handling funds or securities amounting to one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more in any one year, shall be covered by an adequate bond as determined by the board of directors, and at the expense of the association.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-29

.

7-8-30.
Annual audit of books.

Every association shall have its books audited at the end of its fiscal year by an experienced bookkeeper or accountant, who shall not be an officer or director. Where the annual business amounts to less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), the audit may be performed by a committee of three (3), who shall not be directors, officers, or employees. A written report of the audit, the balance sheet, and the income and expenses, shall be submitted to the annual meeting of the association.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-30

.

7-8-31.
Exemption from securities law.

The provisions of chapter 11 of this title do not apply to shares of stock of, or memberships in, associations formed under this chapter, or associations formed under like laws of other states, territories, the District of Columbia, or the United States, or to persons selling shares of stock of, or memberships in, the associations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-31

.

7-8-32.
Acceptance of chapter by cooperatives formed under other law.

Any corporation incorporated under another law of this state and operating on a cooperative basis may elect, by a vote of a majority of its members voting, to secure the benefits of and be bound by this chapter, and shall subsequently amend any of its articles of association and bylaws that are not in conformity with this chapter. A certified copy of the amended articles of association shall be filed with the secretary of state, and a certified copy of the above vote and a fee of five dollars ($5.00) paid to the secretary of state. Upon the filing and the payment of the fee, the corporation is subsequently, in all respects, governed by the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-32

.

7-8-33.
Use of word “cooperative”.

Only associations organized under this chapter, corporations organized on a cooperative basis under any other law of this state, credit unions, unincorporated groups operating on a cooperative basis, and foreign corporations operating on a cooperative basis and authorized to do business in this state, are entitled to use the term “cooperative”, or any abbreviation or derivation of the term, as part of their business name, or to represent themselves as conducting business on a cooperative basis. However, any firm or corporation using the word “cooperative” as part of its business name prior to January 1, 1947, is not subject to the provisions of this section.

Any person, firm, or corporation violating the above provision shall, upon conviction of the offense, be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00), with an additional fine of not more than two hundred dollars ($200) for each month during which a violation occurs, or by imprisonment for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than one year, or by both fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-33

.

7-8-34.
Inapplicable law.

No law in this state that is conflicting or inconsistent with any part of this chapter shall to the extent of the conflict or inconsistency, be construed as applicable to associations formed by authority of this chapter. Sections

7-1.2-613

and

7-1.2-708

do not apply to associations organized by authority of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-34

; P.L. 1985, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 6; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 6.

7-8-35.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter, or the application of it to any person or circumstance is held unconstitutional or otherwise invalid for any reason, the validity of the remainder of this chapter and the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected by the invalidity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1976, § 31; G.L. 1956, §

7-8-35

.